Connecticut, session 2026, SB00063.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
____ dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the Department of
Energy and Environmental Protection for the purpose of providing a
grant-in-aid to the town of Fairfield for the remediation of waste
contamination associated with the Fairfield fill pile.